District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

21-1907

Possession, by receiver, of additional property; collection of debts

Repealed.

History

Feb. 28, 1987, D.C. Law 6-204, § 3, 34 DCR 632

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., §§ 21-1901 to 21-1915.